Hawaii statutes.
§152-2 Rules. Subject to chapter 91,
the department may make rules to effectuate this chapter, including but not
limited to the following:

(1) Establishment of criteria and procedures for the
designation of plant species as noxious weeds for the purposes of this chapter;

(2) Establishment of procedures and conditions for
the initiation of cooperative agreements with landowners and land occupiers for
the purpose of eradicating or controlling noxious weed infestations;

(3) Control or eradication of noxious weeds when
deemed economically feasible. [L 1957, c 319, pt of §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §27A-3; HRS §152-2; am L 1975, c 44, pt of §1;
am L 1987, c 92, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next